Mississippi, session 2026, HB639.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Board of Supervisors of Jackson County, Mississippi, for the purpose of conducting a needs assessment on the location of a new office for the county sheriff at any suitable location in the county, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 $ 25,000.00 SECTION 2.  To conduct the needs assessment authorized under Section 1 of this act, the board of supervisors is authorized to:        (a)  Contract with an engineering firm to conduct the assessment with the funds appropriated by Section 1; or (b)  Provide the funds appropriated by Section 1 to the sheriff's office to contract with an engineering firm to conduct the assessment. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.